tests/xal.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../xal.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../xal.automorf.hfst
Tests:
  Ablative:
    ац<n><abl>: ацгас
    дәр<n><abl>: дәрәс
    ноха<n><abl>: нохаһас
    төгә<n><abl>: төгәһәс
    усн<n><abl>: уснас
  Accusative:
    мал<n><acc>: малиг
    така<n><acc>: такаг
    яма<n><acc>: ямаг
  Adverbs: {}
  Cardinals:
    арвн<num><card>: арвн
    долан<num><card>: долан
    дөрвн<num><card>: дөрвн
    зурһан<num><card>: зурһан
    йисн<num><card>: йисн
    негн<num><card>: негн
    нөөмн<num><card>: нөөмн
    тавн<num><card>: тавн
    хойр<num><card>: хойр
    һурвн<num><card>: һурвн
    җирн<num><card>: җирн
  Conjunctions:
    болн<conjcoo>: болн
    юңгад гихлә<conjsub>: юңгад гихлә
    паре<conjcoo>: паре
  Comitative:
    күүкн<n><com>: күүкнлә
    темән<n><com>: темәнлә
    эк<n><com>: эклә
  Dative:
    багш<n><dat>: багшт
    мөрн<n><dat>: мөрнд
    нөкр<n><dat>: нөкрт
    сам<n><dat>: самд
    таг<n><dat>: тагт
    темән<n><dat>: темәнд
  Directive:
    ац<n><dir>: ацур
    балһсн<n><dir>: балһснур
    ваһн<n><dir>: ваһнур
  Genitive:
    дүү<n><gen>: дүүһин
    модн<n><gen>: модна
    така<n><gen>: такан
    тег<n><gen>: теегин
    хөн<n><gen>: хөөнә
    школ<n><gen>: школин
  Instrumental:
    мөсн<n><ins>: мөснәр 
    төгә<n><ins>: төгәһәр
    һар<n><ins>: һарар
  Noun Cases: {}
  Nouns:
    живр<n><sg>: живр
    пүрвә<n><sg>: пүрвә
    Улусы<n><sg>: Улусы
    саваго<n>: саваго
    өөмсн<n><pl>: өөмсн
    Эн<n>: Эн
  Numerals: {}
  Ordinals:
    арвн<num><ord>: арвдгч
    долан<num><ord>: доладгч
    дөрв<num><ord>: дөрвдгч
    зурһан<num><ord>: зурһадгч
    йисн<num><ord>: йисдгч
    негн<num><ord>: негдгч
    нөөмн<num><ord>: нөөмдгч
    тавн<num><ord>: тавдгч
    хойр<num><ord>: хойрдгч
    һурв<num><ord>: һурвдгч
    җирн<num><ord>: җирндгч
  Participles:
    ал<v><pres>: алдг
    ир<v><fut>: ирх
    кел<v><fut>: келх
    ор<v><past>: орсн
    суу<v><pres>: суудг
    суңһагд<v><past>: суңһагдсн
    умш<v><fut>: умшх
    үк<v><past>: үксн
  Parts of Speech: {}
  Personal Pronouns:
    чи<prn><pers><p2><sg><inf><nom>: чи
    чи<prn><pers><p2><sg><inf><gen>: чини
    чи<prn><pers><p2><sg><inf><acc>: чамаг
    чи<prn><pers><p2><sg><inf><dat>: чамд
    чи<prn><pers><p2><sg><inf><abl>: чамас
    чи<prn><pers><p2><sg><inf><ins>: чамар
    чи<prn><pers><p2><sg><inf><com>: чамла
    чи<prn><pers><p2><sg><inf><pos>: чамта
    чи<prn><pers><p2><sg><inf><dir>: чамур
    би<prn><pers><p1><sg><nom>: би
    би<prn><pers><p1><sg><gen>: мини
    бидн<prn><pers><p1><pl><inc><nom>: бидн
    би<prn><pers><p1><sg><acc>: намаг
    би<prn><pers><p1><sg><dat>: {намд, нанд}
    би<prn><pers><p1><sg><abl>: {намас, нанас}
    би<prn><pers><p1><sg><ins>: {намар, нанар}
    би<prn><pers><p1><sg><com>: {намла, нанла}
    би<prn><pers><p1><sg><pos>: {намта, нанта}
    би<prn><pers><p1><sg><dir>: {намур, нанур}
    та<prn><pers><p2><sg><for><nom>: та
    та<prn><pers><p2><sg><for><gen>: тана
    та<prn><pers><p2><sg><for><acc>: таниг
    та<prn><pers><p2><sg><for><dat>: танд
    та<prn><pers><p2><sg><for><abl>: танас
    та<prn><pers><p2><sg><for><ins>: танар
    та<prn><pers><p2><sg><for><com>: танла 
    та<prn><pers><p2><sg><for><pos>: танта
    та<prn><pers><p2><sg><for><dir>: танур
    бидн<prn><pers><p1><pl><inc><gen>: мана
    бидн<prn><pers><p1><pl><inc><acc>: маниг
    бидн<prn><pers><p1><pl><inc><dat>: манд
    бидн<prn><pers><p1><pl><inc><abl>: манас
    бидн<prn><pers><p1><pl><inc><ins>: манар
    бидн<prn><pers><p1><pl><inc><com>: манла
    бидн<prn><pers><p1><pl><inc><pos>: манта
    бидн<prn><pers><p1><pl><inc><dir>: манур
    мадн<prn><pers><p1><pl><exc><nom>: мадн
    мадн<prn><pers><p1><pl><exc><gen>: мадна 
    мадн<prn><pers><p1><pl><exc><acc>: мадниг 
    мадн<prn><pers><p1><pl><exc><dat>: маднд 
    мадн<prn><pers><p1><pl><exc><abl>: маднас 
    мадн<prn><pers><p1><pl><exc><ins>: маднар 
    мадн<prn><pers><p1><pl><exc><com>: маднла 
    мадн<prn><pers><p1><pl><exc><pos>: маднта 
    мадн<prn><pers><p1><pl><exc><dir>: маднур 
    тадн<prn><pers><p2><pl><nom>: тадн
    тадн<prn><pers><p2><pl><gen>: тадна
    тадн<prn><pers><p2><pl><acc>: тадниг
    тадн<prn><pers><p2><pl><dat>: таднд
    тадн<prn><pers><p2><pl><abl>: таднас
    тадн<prn><pers><p2><pl><ins>: таднар
    тадн<prn><pers><p2><pl><com>: таднла
    тадн<prn><pers><p2><pl><pos>: таднта
    тадн<prn><pers><p2><pl><dir>: таднур
  Possessive:
    гер<n><pos>: гертә
    керм<n><pos>: кермтә
    темән<n><pos>: темәнтә
  Possessive Suffixes:
    гер<n><px2pl>: гертн
    көвүн<n><px1pl>: көвүнмдн
    көвүн<n><px2sg>: көвүнчи
    би<n><px2sg>: бичи 
    өдр<n><px3sp>: өдрнь 

  Pronouns: {}
  Verbs: {}
